Utah statutes.
40-2-202.   Appointment of director.
(1)  The director is the chief officer of the office and serves as the
executive and administrative head of the office.
(2) (a)  The commissioner shall appoint the director.
(b)  The director may be removed from that position at the will of the
commissioner.
(3)  The director shall receive compensation as provided by Title 67, Chapter
19, Utah State Personnel Management Act.
(4)  The director shall be experienced in administration and possess such
additional qualifications as determined by the commissioner.
